Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-334.01
International Registration
Plan, defined.

International Registration Plan means the
International Registration Plan adopted by International Registration Plan,
Inc.

Laws 2008, LB756, § 8.